Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6331.01
Environmental audits; applicability.

Sections 25-21,254 to 25-21,264 do not apply to the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 54;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1284.